Oklahoma, session 2025, SB314.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. AMENDATORY Section 1, Chapter 32, 1st


Extraordinary Session, O.S.L. 2023 (74 O.S. Supp. 2024, Section 840-


2.20D), is amended to read as follows:


Section 840-2.20D. A. Any full-time employee of this state who


has been employed by the state agency for at least two (2) years


prior to the request for leave shall be entitled to six (6) weeks of


paid maternity parental leave following the birth or adoption of the


employee’s child. For the purposes of this section, “full-time


employee of this state” shall include individuals employed by


institutions of higher education within The Oklahoma State System of


Higher Education.



Req. No. 1061 Page 1


B. Paid maternity parental leave pursuant to this section shall


be in addition to and not in place of sick leave due to pregnancy,


as authorized by Section 840-2.20 of Title 74 of the Oklahoma


Statutes this title.


C. An employee who is granted maternity parental leave pursuant


to the provisions of this section shall receive the employee’s


annual salary without interruption during the maternity parental


leave. For purposes of determining seniority, pay or pay


advancement, and performance awards, and for the receipt of any


benefit that may be affected by maternity parental leave, the


service of the employee shall be considered uninterrupted by the


maternity parental leave.


D. The Director of the Office of Management and Enterprise


Services may promulgate rules to implement the provisions of this


section.


SECTION 2. The provisions of this act shall not become


effective as law unless Enrolled Senate Bill No. 87 of the 1st


Session of the 60th Oklahoma Legislature becomes effective as law.




60-1-1061 EB 12/31/2024 7:33:22 AM









Req. No. 1061 Page 2